Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-115 False or misleading
information. No person or organization shall wilfully withhold information
from or knowingly give false or misleading information to the commissioner, any
statistical agency designated by the commissioner, any rating organization, or
any insurer, which will affect the rates or premiums chargeable under this
article. Violation of this section shall subject the one guilty of such
violation to the penalties provided in section 431:14-117. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next